Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,125.08
Mobile cosmetology salon; owner liability.

The owner of each mobile cosmetology salon shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the salon is operated in compliance with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations and shall be liable for any and all violations occurring in the salon.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 44.